Illinois, session 104th, HB3186.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Real Estate License Act of 2000 is amended 5by changing Section 10-30 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 454/10-30)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2030)8    Sec. 10-30. Advertising.9    (a) No advertising, whether in print, via the Internet, or 10through social media, digital forums, or any other media, 11shall be fraudulent, deceptive, inherently misleading, or 12proven to be misleading in practice. Advertising shall be 13considered misleading or untruthful if, when taken as a whole, 14there is a distinct and reasonable possibility that it will be 15misunderstood or will deceive the ordinary consumer. 16Advertising shall contain all information necessary to 17communicate the information contained therein to the public in 18an accurate, direct, and readily comprehensible manner. If 19residential real estate is being advertised that belongs to a 20homeowner's association, it must contain information about the 21nature and cost of homeowner's association fees. This 22disclosure must be in any Multiple Listing Service (MLS) used 23in the advertising. Team names may not contain inherently   HB3186- 2 -LRB104 10956 JRC 21038 b1misleading terms, such as "company", "realty", "real estate", 2"agency", "associates", "brokers", "properties", or 3"property". 4    (b) No blind advertisements may be used by any licensee, 5in any media, except as provided for in this Section.6    (c) A licensee shall disclose, in writing, to all parties 7in a transaction the licensee's status as a licensee and any 8and all interest the licensee has or may have in the real 9estate constituting the subject matter thereof, directly or 10indirectly, according to the following guidelines:11        (1) On broker yard signs or in broker advertisements, 12    no disclosure of ownership is necessary. However, the 13    ownership shall be indicated on any property data form 14    accessible to the consumer and disclosed to persons 15    responding to any advertisement or any sign. The term 16    "broker owned" or "agent owned" is sufficient disclosure.17        (2) A sponsored or inactive licensee selling or 18    leasing property, owned solely by the sponsored or 19    inactive licensee, without utilizing brokerage services of 20    their sponsoring broker or any other licensee, may 21    advertise "By Owner". For purposes of this Section, 22    property is "solely owned" by a sponsored or inactive 23    licensee if the licensee (i) has a 100% ownership interest 24    alone, (ii) has ownership as a joint tenant or tenant by 25    the entirety, or (iii) holds a 100% beneficial interest in 26    a land trust. Sponsored or inactive licensees selling or   HB3186- 3 -LRB104 10956 JRC 21038 b1    leasing "By Owner" shall comply with the following if 2    advertising by owner:3            (A) On "By Owner" yard signs, the sponsored or 4        inactive licensee shall indicate "broker owned" or 5        "agent owned." "By Owner" advertisements used in any 6        medium of advertising shall include the term "broker 7        owned" or "agent owned."8            (B) If a sponsored or inactive licensee runs 9        advertisements, for the purpose of purchasing or 10        leasing real estate, the licensee shall disclose in 11        the advertisements the licensee's status as a 12        licensee.13            (C) A sponsored or inactive licensee shall not use 14        the sponsoring broker's name or the sponsoring 15        broker's company name in connection with the sale, 16        lease, or advertisement of the property nor utilize 17        the sponsoring broker's or company's name in 18        connection with the sale, lease, or advertising of the 19        property in a manner likely to create confusion among 20        the public as to whether or not the services of a real 21        estate company are being utilized or whether or not a 22        real estate company has an ownership interest in the 23        property.24    (d) A sponsored licensee may not advertise under the 25licensee's own name. Advertising in any media shall be under 26the direct supervision of the sponsoring or designated   HB3186- 4 -LRB104 10956 JRC 21038 b1managing broker and in the sponsoring broker's business name, 2which in the case of a franchise shall include the franchise 3affiliation as well as the name of the individual firm. This 4provision does not apply under the following circumstances:5        (1) When a licensee enters into a brokerage agreement 6    relating to real estate owned by the licensee, or real 7    estate in which the licensee has an ownership interest, 8    with another licensed broker; or9        (2) When a licensee is selling or leasing real estate 10    owned by the licensee or buying or leasing real estate for 11    their own use, after providing the appropriate written 12    disclosure of ownership interest as required in paragraph 13    (2) of subsection (c) of this Section.14    (e) No licensee shall list the licensee's name or 15otherwise advertise in the licensee's own name to the general 16public through any medium of advertising as being in the real 17estate business without listing the sponsoring broker's 18business name.19    (f) The sponsoring broker's business name and the name of 20the licensee must appear in all advertisements, including 21business cards. In advertising that includes the sponsoring 22broker's name and a team name or individual broker's name, the 23sponsoring broker's business name shall be at least equal in 24size or larger than the team name or that of the individual.25    (g) Those individuals licensed as a managing broker and 26designated with the Department as a designated managing broker   HB3186- 5 -LRB104 10956 JRC 21038 b1by their sponsoring broker shall identify themselves to the 2public in advertising, except on "For Sale" or similar signs, 3as a designated managing broker. No other individuals holding 4a managing broker's license may hold themselves out to the 5public or other licensees as a designated managing broker, but 6they may hold themselves out to be a managing broker. 7(Source: P.A. 103-236, eff. 1-1-24.)